District of Columbia statutes.
29-1206.04

Distribution to beneficial owner.

(a)

When a beneficial owner becomes entitled to receive a distribution, with respect to the distribution, the beneficial owner shall have the status of, and shall be entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the statutory trust.

(b)

A beneficial owner has a right to a distribution before the dissolution and winding up of a statutory trust only if the trustee decides to make an interim distribution. A beneficial owner shall not have a right to demand or to receive a distribution from the trust in any form other than money.

(c)

Except as otherwise provided in § 29-1208.03(b), the trust may distribute an asset in kind if each part of the asset is fungible with each other part and each beneficial owner receives a percentage of the asset equal in value to the beneficial owner’s share of the distribution.

(d)

Any distributions made by a statutory trust before its dissolution and winding up must be in proportion to the beneficial interests.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(l)(7)(D), 59 DCR 13171

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added the first sentence in (b); added “Except as otherwise provided in § 29-1208.03(b)” in (c); and added (d).

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 604 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.